Tennessee statutes. Title 30 Administration of Estates
Part 2

Bonds

30-1-201. When bond required.

The clerk shall not require a bond of the personal representative before issuing letters testamentary or letters of administration if:

The decedent by will excuses the personal representative from making bond;

The personal representative and the sole beneficiary of the estate are the same person and the court approves;

All of the beneficiaries are adults, who are not under a disability that would preclude them from acting, and all beneficiaries consent to the personal representative serving without bond by filing a sworn statement, or a statement under penalty of perjury, with the court and the court approves; or

The personal representative is a bank that is excused from the requirements of bond by § 45-2-1005.

If the preceding exemptions from making bond do not apply, the clerk, before issuing the letters, shall take from the personal representative a bond payable to the state, with two (2) or more sufficient sureties or one (1) corporate surety, in an amount determined by the court. If bond is required, the bond shall not be less than the value of the estate of the decedent subject to administration nor more than double the value of the estate and the court may increase or decrease the amount at any time by order.

Any interested person may petition the court to suggest and show that the personal representative is wasting, or likely to waste, the estate. In this event, the court may require bond in an amount it deems advisable.

Code 1858, § 2222 (deriv. Acts 1715, ch. 48, § 5; 1813, ch. 120, § 4); Shan., § 3957; Acts 1923, ch. 48, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3957a1; mod. Code 1932, § 8169; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-201; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 6; 2016, ch. 809, § 6.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote (a)(1)(C) which read: “(C) All of the beneficiaries of the estate are adults and all of them consent in writing to the personal representative's serving without bond and the court approves; or”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 809, § 8. April 14, 2016.

Cross-References. Administrator appointed upon resignation of representatives to give bond, § 30-1-112.

Bond of appointee in chancery court, § 30-1-306.

Fiduciary bond or oath excused, § 45-2-1005.

Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, title 16, chapter 16, part 2.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 33, 35, 526, 581, 584, 585, 968.

Law Reviews.

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

Selection and Removal of Fiduciaries (Robert L. McMurray), 26 No. 3, Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

30-1-202. Increasing amount of bond or adding sureties.

The court shall, upon a showing made by any person interested in the estate that the bond is not sufficient either as to the amount or as to the solvency of the surety or sureties, increase the bond as to amount or require additional sureties, or both, so as fully to protect all persons interested.

Acts 1923, ch. 48, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3957a1; mod. Code 1932, § 8170; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-202.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 589.

Collateral References.

Discretion or power of court, after bond of executor or administrator has been given, to dispense with, discontinue, or modify bond. 121 A.L.R. 951.

30-1-203. Form of bond.

The bond must be substantially in the following form:

We, A B, C D, and E F, are bound to the state in the penalty of dollars. Witness our hands, this day of , 20 . The condition of this obligation is such, that, whereas, the above bound A B has been appointed executor of the will of G H, deceased (or administrator, as the case may be); now, if A B shall well and truly, as such executor (or administrator, as the case may be), perform all the duties that are or may be required by law, which includes paying all court costs, attorney's fees, and other expenses which may be reasonably incurred because of failure of A B to properly account for and utilize all funds coming into the hands of A B, this obligation shall be void, otherwise to remain in full force and virtue.

Code 1858, § 2223 (deriv. Acts 1715, ch. 48, § 5; 1822, ch. 16, § 1); Shan., § 3958; Code 1932, § 8171; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-203; Acts 2011, ch. 477, §§ 1, 2.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 33, 582.

30-1-204. Liability on bond for performance of trusts.

All executors and their sureties shall be liable upon their bonds for the performance of all the trusts of the will that they are required to perform, as also all duties devolving upon them as executors, as well in relation to the real as personal estate; and, in like manner, administrators with the will annexed, and their sureties, shall be liable upon their bonds for the performance of all the trusts and duties of their respective offices, as well in relation to real as personal estates; and the bonds, when taken substantially in the forms prescribed by law, shall bind the executors and administrators, and their sureties, as provided in this section.

If, however, the final account of an executor or administrator with the will annexed is settled before the full performance of all the trusts of the will, and trust funds of the estate, as shown by the settlement of the account, are turned over to a trustee duly qualified as provided for in the will, to complete the performance of the trusts, the executor or administrator with the will annexed and the sureties shall not be liable for the further performance of the trusts.

Acts 1889, ch. 36; Shan., § 3959; mod. Code 1932, § 8172; Acts 1953, ch. 157, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-204.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 134.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 591.

30-1-205. Validity of bond not dependent upon form.

The bond or any other bond executed by the parties, although not strictly in accordance with the above provision and form, because made payable to a different payee, or because the condition is more extensive or less extensive, or otherwise, shall be valid and effectual to the extent of its stipulations and conditions, and subject the parties to the bond in the same way as if the bond had been drawn in strict conformity to law, so long as the language of the bond includes, within the total obligation of the bond, the obligation to pay all court costs, attorney's fees, and other expenses reasonably incurred because of the failure of the personal representative to properly account for and utilize all funds coming into the hands of the personal representative.

Code 1858, § 2224; Shan., § 3960; mod. Code 1932, § 8173; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-205; Acts 2011, ch. 477, § 3.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 33, 583, 591.

30-1-206. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 30-1-206 (Code 1858, § 2225 (deriv. Acts 1813, ch. 120, § 4); Shan., § 3961; Code 1932, § 8174; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-206), concerning when bonds are required, was repealed by Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 1.

30-1-207. Petition and order for administration bond — Appointment and duty of new administrator.

A copy of such petition shall be served on the personal representative ten (10) days before any motion is made for an order of court upon the personal representative to give an administration bond.

Upon satisfactory proof of the truth of the complaint, the court shall direct the personal representative to enter into bond with sureties, as other personal representatives are required to do.

If the personal representative fails to comply with the order within ten (10) days after it is made, the court shall appoint an administrator for the estate, who shall give bond, with surety, as personal representatives are required to do.

The administrator shall dispose of the estate agreeably to the will of the deceased, and shall forthwith call the personal representative to account.

Code 1858, §§ 2226-2229 (deriv. Acts 1813, ch. 120, § 4); Shan., §§ 3962-3965; Code 1932, §§ 8175-8178; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-207 — 30-210; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 7.

Cross-References. Power of administrators with will annexed, § 30-1-115.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 33, 561, 564, 588.

30-1-208. Suit on administration bond.

Any person interested in or entitled to a recovery on a bond given by a personal representative may commence and prosecute a suit on the same in the name of the state of Tennessee for that person's own use.

Where several persons are entitled to a recovery on bonds given by a personal representative, a verdict and judgment or a decree rendered on the bond in favor of one shall not be a bar to any other person so entitled, but each may respectively sue for and recover each person's own proportion until the whole penalty is recovered.

When suits are brought on bonds given by a personal representative, it shall be sufficient to make profert of an attested or certified copy, and, if the copy is contested, either party may have a subpoena for the clerk to bring the original bond.

The person for whose use a suit may be brought under this law shall be liable to costs in the same manner as if the suit had been brought in the person's own name, and the court may render judgment or decree for the costs accordingly.

Code 1858, §§ 2231-2234 (deriv. Acts 1822, ch. 16, §§ 1-4); Shan., §§ 3967-3970; Code 1932, §§ 8179-8182; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-211 — 30-214; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 8.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 595, 986.